Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3504.01
Certificate of authorization, defined.

Certificate of authorization means a certificate issued by the board to an organization authorizing it to practice or offer to practice geology as provided in section 81-3528.

Laws 2025, LB38, § 4.